Hawaii, session 2025, SB1565.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 436E-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§436E-1[]]  Declaration of necessity for regulation and control.  The legislature hereby finds and declares that the practice of acupuncture is a theory and method for treatment of illness and disability and for strengthening and invigorating the body and as such affects the public health, safety, and welfare, and therefore there is a necessity that individuals practicing acupuncture be recognized as essential health care providers and subject to regulation and control." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________